Louisiana, session 2026, SB176.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:17(F) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§17. Prescribed burning; intent and purpose; authorization; definitions
* * *
F. Persons who wish to complain about certain prescribed burns shall issue
their complaints to the commissioner. The commissioner shall investigate such
complaints and have the authority to may suspend or revoke his authorization for the
prescribed burn for persons found to be in violation of the prescribed burn
requirements or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this Section.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-376 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 176